pl: Specyfikacja oleju silnikowego: ACEA A3/B4; ACEA A5/B5; ACEA C2; ACEA C3; ACEA C5; API CF; API CG-4; API CH-4; API CI-4; API CJ-4; API CK-4; API FA-4; API SJ; API SL; API SM; API SN; API SN Plus; API SP; ILSAC GF-6A; ILSAC GF-6B; Inne
bg-BG: Спецификация на моторното масло: ACEA A3/B4; ACEA A5/B5; ACEA C2; ACEA C3; ACEA C5; API CF; API CG-4; API CH-4; API CI-4; API CJ-4; API CK-4; API FA-4; API SJ; API SL; API SM; API SN; API SN Plus; API SP; ILSAC GF-6A; ILSAC GF-6B; Друго
pt-PT: Especificação do óleo do motor: ACEA A3/B4; ACEA A5/B5; ACEA C2; ACEA C3; ACEA C5; API CF; API CG-4; API CH-4; API CI-4; API CJ-4; API CK-4; API FA-4; API SJ; API SL; API SM; API SN; API SN Plus; API SP; ILSAC GF-6A; ILSAC GF-6B; Outro
sk-SK: Špecifikácia motorového oleja: ACEA A3/B4; ACEA A5/B5; ACEA C2; ACEA C3; ACEA C5; API CF; API CG-4; API CH-4; API CI-4; API CJ-4; API CK-4; API FA-4; API SJ; API SL; API SM; API SN; API SN Plus; API SP; ILSAC GF-6A; ILSAC GF-6B; Iné
en: Engine oil specification: ACEA A3/B4; ACEA A5/B5; ACEA C2; ACEA C3; ACEA C5; API CF; API CG-4; API CH-4; API CI-4; API CJ-4; API CK-4; API FA-4; API SJ; API SL; API SM; API SN; API SN Plus; API SP; ILSAC GF-6A; ILSAC GF-6B; Other
fi: Moottoriöljyn määritys: ACEA A3/B4; ACEA A5/B5; ACEA C2; ACEA C3; ACEA C5; API CF; API CG-4; API CH-4; API CI-4; API CJ-4; API CK-4; API FA-4; API SJ; API SL; API SM; API SN; API SN Plus; API SP; ILSAC GF-6A; ILSAC GF-6B; Muu
lt-LT: Variklio alyvos specifikacija: ACEA A3/B4; ACEA A5/B5; ACEA C2; ACEA C3; ACEA C5; API CF; API CG-4; API CH-4; API CI-4; API CJ-4; API CK-4; API FA-4; API SJ; API SL; API SM; API SN; API SN Plus; API SP; ILSAC GF-6A; ILSAC GF-6B; Kita
ja: エンジンオイルの仕様: ACEA A3/B4; ACEA A5/B5; ACEA C2; ACEA C3; ACEA C5; API CF; API CG-4; API CH-4; API CI-4; API CJ-4; API CK-4; API FA-4; API SJ; API SL; API SM; API SN; API SN Plus; API SP; ILSAC GF-6A; ILSAC GF-6B; その他
tr: Motor yağı özellikleri: ACEA A3/B4; ACEA A5/B5; ACEA C2; ACEA C3; ACEA C5; API CF; API CG-4; API CH-4; API CI-4; API CJ-4; API CK-4; API FA-4; API SJ; API SL; API SM; API SN; API SN Plus; API SP; ILSAC GF-6A; ILSAC GF-6B; Diğer
ro-RO: Specificațiile uleiului de motor: ACEA A3/B4; ACEA A5/B5; ACEA C2; ACEA C3; ACEA C5; API CF; API CG-4; API CH-4; API CI-4; API CJ-4; API CK-4; API FA-4; API SJ; API SL; API SM; API SN; API SN Plus; API SP; ILSAC GF-6A; ILSAC GF-6B; Altele
hu: Motorolaj-specifikáció: ACEA A3/B4; ACEA A5/B5; ACEA C2; ACEA C3; ACEA C5; API CF; API CG-4; API CH-4; API CI-4; API CJ-4; API CK-4; API FA-4; API SJ; API SL; API SM; API SN; API SN Plus; API SP; ILSAC GF-6A; ILSAC GF-6B; Egyéb
ko: 엔진 오일 규격: ACEA A3/B4; ACEA A5/B5; ACEA C2; ACEA C3; ACEA C5; API CF; API CG-4; API CH-4; API CI-4; API CJ-4; API CK-4; API FA-4; API SJ; API SL; API SM; API SN; API SN Plus; API SP; ILSAC GF-6A; ILSAC GF-6B; 기타
vi: Thông số kỹ thuật dầu động cơ: ACEA A3/B4; ACEA A5/B5; ACEA C2; ACEA C3; ACEA C5; API CF; API CG-4; API CH-4; API CI-4; API CJ-4; API CK-4; API FA-4; API SJ; API SL; API SM; API SN; API SN Plus; API SP; ILSAC GF-6A; ILSAC GF-6B; Khác
da: Motoroliespecifikation: ACEA A3/B4; ACEA A5/B5; ACEA C2; ACEA C3; ACEA C5; API CF; API CG-4; API CH-4; API CI-4; API CJ-4; API CK-4; API FA-4; API SJ; API SL; API SM; API SN; API SN Plus; API SP; ILSAC GF-6A; ILSAC GF-6B; Andet
es: Especificación del aceite del motor: ACEA A3/B4; ACEA A5/B5; ACEA C2; ACEA C3; ACEA C5; API CF; API CG-4; API CH-4; API CI-4; API CJ-4; API CK-4; API FA-4; API SJ; API SL; API SM; API SN; API SN Plus; API SP; ILSAC GF-6A; ILSAC GF-6B; Otra
sv: Motoroljans specifikation: ACEA A3/B4; ACEA A5/B5; ACEA C2; ACEA C3; ACEA C5; API CF; API CG-4; API CH-4; API CI-4; API CJ-4; API CK-4; API FA-4; API SJ; API SL; API SM; API SN; API SN Plus; API SP; ILSAC GF-6A; ILSAC GF-6B; Annat
hr-HR: Specifikacija motornog ulja: ACEA A3/B4; ACEA A5/B5; ACEA C2; ACEA C3; ACEA C5; API CF; API CG-4; API CH-4; API CI-4; API CJ-4; API CK-4; API FA-4; API SJ; API SL; API SM; API SN; API SN Plus; API SP; ILSAC GF-6A; ILSAC GF-6B; Ostalo
th: ข้อกำหนดน้ำมันเครื่องยนต์: ACEA A3/B4; ACEA A5/B5; ACEA C2; ACEA C3; ACEA C5; API CF; API CG-4; API CH-4; API CI-4; API CJ-4; API CK-4; API FA-4; API SJ; API SL; API SM; API SN; API SN Plus; API SP; ILSAC GF-6A; ILSAC GF-6B; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Especificação do óleo do motor: ACEA A3/B4; ACEA A5/B5; ACEA C2; ACEA C3; ACEA C5; API CF; API CG-4; API CH-4; API CI-4; API CJ-4; API CK-4; API FA-4; API SJ; API SL; API SM; API SN; API SN Plus; API SP; ILSAC GF-6A; ILSAC GF-6B; Outro
nl: Motorolie specificatie: ACEA A3/B4; ACEA A5/B5; ACEA C2; ACEA C3; ACEA C5; API CF; API CG-4; API CH-4; API CI-4; API CJ-4; API CK-4; API FA-4; API SJ; API SL; API SM; API SN; API SN Plus; API SP; ILSAC GF-6A; ILSAC GF-6B; Overig
de: Motorölspezifikation: ACEA A3/B4; ACEA A5/B5; ACEA C2; ACEA C3; ACEA C5; API CF; API CG-4; API CH-4; API CI-4; API CJ-4; API CK-4; API FA-4; API SJ; API SL; API SM; API SN; API SN Plus; API SP; ILSAC GF-6A; ILSAC GF-6B; Sonstige
it: Specifiche dell'olio motore: ACEA A3/B4; ACEA A5/B5; ACEA C2; ACEA C3; ACEA C5; API CF; API CG-4; API CH-4; API CI-4; API CJ-4; API CK-4; API FA-4; API SJ; API SL; API SM; API SN; API SN Plus; API SP; ILSAC GF-6A; ILSAC GF-6B; Altro
zh-TW: 機油規格: ACEA A3/B4; ACEA A5/B5; ACEA C2; ACEA C3; ACEA C5; API CF; API CG-4; API CH-4; API CI-4; API CJ-4; API CK-4; API FA-4; API SJ; API SL; API SM; API SN; API SN Plus; API SP; ILSAC GF-6A; ILSAC GF-6B; 其他
cs: Specifikace motorového oleje: ACEA A3/B4; ACEA A5/B5; ACEA C2; ACEA C3; ACEA C5; API CF; API CG-4; API CH-4; API CI-4; API CJ-4; API CK-4; API FA-4; API SJ; API SL; API SM; API SN; API SN Plus; API SP; ILSAC GF-6A; ILSAC GF-6B; Jiné
nb: Spesifikasjon for motorolje: ACEA A3/B4; ACEA A5/B5; ACEA C2; ACEA C3; ACEA C5; API CF; API CG-4; API CH-4; API CI-4; API CJ-4; API CK-4; API FA-4; API SJ; API SL; API SM; API SN; API SN Plus; API SP; ILSAC GF-6A; ILSAC GF-6B; Annet
sl-SI: Specifikacija motornega olja: ACEA A3/B4; ACEA A5/B5; ACEA C2; ACEA C3; ACEA C5; API CF; API CG-4; API CH-4; API CI-4; API CJ-4; API CK-4; API FA-4; API SJ; API SL; API SM; API SN; API SN Plus; API SP; ILSAC GF-6A; ILSAC GF-6B; Drugo
zh-CN: 发动机油规格: ACEA A3/B4; ACEA A5/B5; ACEA C2; ACEA C3; ACEA C5; API CF; API CG-4; API CH-4; API CI-4; API CJ-4; API CK-4; API FA-4; API SJ; API SL; API SM; API SN; API SN Plus; API SP; ILSAC GF-6A; ILSAC GF-6B; 其他
el: Προδιαγραφές λαδιού κινητήρα: ACEA A3/B4; ACEA A5/B5; ACEA C2; ACEA C3; ACEA C5; API CF; API CG-4; API CH-4; API CI-4; API CJ-4; API CK-4; API FA-4; API SJ; API SL; API SM; API SN; API SN Plus; API SP; ILSAC GF-6A; ILSAC GF-6B; Άλλο
ru: Спецификация моторного масла: ACEA A3/B4; ACEA A5/B5; ACEA C2; ACEA C3; ACEA C5; API CF; API CG-4; API CH-4; API CI-4; API CJ-4; API CK-4; API FA-4; API SJ; API SL; API SM; API SN; API SN Plus; API SP; ILSAC GF-6A; ILSAC GF-6B; Другое
fr: Spécification de l’huile moteur: ACEA A3/B4; ACEA A5/B5; ACEA C2; ACEA C3; ACEA C5; API CF; API CG-4; API CH-4; API CI-4; API CJ-4; API CK-4; API FA-4; API SJ; API SL; API SM; API SN; API SN Plus; API SP; ILSAC GF-6A; ILSAC GF-6B; Autre